Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. Election Precincts and Officials.

Administrative Code. —

For election precincts, see 6 AAC, part 10.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 53-65.

Admissibility of parol evidence of election officials to impeach election returns. 46 ALR2d 1385.

Sec. 15.10.010.
Precinct boundaries initially established.

The state is divided into the election precincts as established for the general election of October 1958, or as subsequently amended as prescribed by law, and shall remain so divided until the precinct boundaries are modified, or the precinct is abolished or a precinct is established as required by the provisions of this title.

History.

(§ 2.01 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.10.020.
Precinct boundaries and polling places modified by director.

The director shall have the exclusive power to modify the boundary of a precinct and to establish or abolish a precinct and polling place in the state by regulations adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

[Repealed, § 61 ch 2 FSSLA 2005.]

History.

(§ 2.02 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 22 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 67 SLA 1989; am § 61 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide election districts and election district precincts, see 6 AAC 100.

For House District 1 — Ketchikan, see 6 AAC 101.

For House District 2 — Sitka-Wrangell-Petersburg, see 6 AAC 102.

For House District 3 — Juneau/Downtown/Douglas, see 6 AAC 103.

For House District 4 — Juneau/Mendenhall Valley, see 6 AAC 104.

For House District 5 — Southeast Islands, see 6 AAC 105.

For House District 6 — Interior Villages, see 6 AAC 106.

For House District 7 — Farmer’s Loop/Steese Highway, see 6 AAC 107.

For House District 8 — University/West Fairbanks, see 6 AAC 108.

For House District 9 — City of Fairbanks, see 6 AAC 109.

For House District 12 — Richardson/Glenn Highways, see 6 AAC 112.

For House District 13 — Greater Palmer, see 6 AAC 113.

For House District 14 — Greater Wasilla, see 6 AAC 114.

For House District 15 — Rural Mat-Su, see 6 AAC 115.

For House District 16 — Chugiak/South Mat-Su, see 6 AAC 116.

For House District 17 — Eagle River, see 6 AAC 117.

For House District 18 — Military, see 6 AAC 118.

For House District 19 — Muldoon, see 6 AAC 119.

For House District 20 — Mountain View/Wonder Park, see 6 AAC 120.

For House District 21 — Baxter Bog, see 6 AAC 121.

For House District 22 — University/Airport Heights, see 6 AAC 122.

For House District 23 — Downtown/Rogers Park, see 6 AAC 123.

For House District 24 — Midtown/Taku, see 6 AAC 124.

For House District 25 — East Spenard, see 6 AAC 125.

For House District 26 — Turnagain/Inlet View, see 6 AAC 126.

For House District 27 — Sand Lake, see 6 AAC 127.

For House District 28 — Bayshore/Klatt, see 6 AAC 128.

For House District 29 — Campbell/Independence Park, see 6 AAC 129.

For House District 32 — Chugach State Park, see 6 AAC 132.

For House District 33 — Kenai/Soldotna, see 6 AAC 133.

For House District 34 — Rural Kenai, see 6 AAC 134.

For House District 35 — Homer/Seward, see 6 AAC 135.

For House District 36 — Kodiak, see 6 AAC 136.

For House District 37 — Bristol Bay/Aleutians, see 6 AAC 137.

For House District 38 — Bethel, see 6 AAC 138.

For House District 39 — Bering Straits, see 6 AAC 139.

For House District 40 — Arctic, see 6 AAC 140.

Sec. 15.10.030.
Uniform precinct boundaries required for state and local elections.

The precinct boundaries established by the director shall be the boundaries for both state and local elections. The director by regulation adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) may authorize the combining, consolidation, or altering of precinct boundaries for local elections.

History.

(§ 2.03 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 23 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.10.040.
Restriction on precinct boundary modification.

A precinct may not include territory lying within more than one house district. Whenever practicable, precinct boundaries shall conform to municipal boundaries.

History.

(§ 2.04 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 35 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.10.050.
General duty and standard for precinct boundary modification.

The director shall modify the boundary of a precinct, and shall establish or abolish a precinct if the action serves the convenience of the voters and assures the efficient administration of election laws.

History.

(§ 2.05 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 24 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.10.060.
Specific duty and standard for precinct boundary modification. [Repealed, § 38 ch 116 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 15.10.070.
Precinct boundary identification.

Each precinct shall be given an appropriate name or number and be clearly defined so the boundaries can be readily determined.

History.

(§ 2.07 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.10.080.
Dates for designating precinct boundary.

The director shall designate boundaries of an election precinct which has been established or modified, not later than 40 days before an election.

History.

(§ 2.08 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 25 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.10.090.
Notice of precinct boundary or polling place designation and modification.

The director shall give full public notice if a precinct is established or abolished, if the boundaries of a precinct are designated, abolished, or modified, or if the location of a polling place is changed. Public notice must include

whenever possible, sending written notice of the change to each affected registered voter in the precinct;

providing notice of the change

by publication once in a local newspaper of general circulation in the precinct; or

if there is not a local newspaper of general circulation in the precinct, by posting written notice in three conspicuous places as close to the precinct as possible; at least one posting location must be in the precinct;

posting notice of the change on the Internet website of the division of elections;

providing notification of the change to the appropriate municipal clerks, community councils, tribal groups, Native villages, and village regional corporations established under 43 U.S.C. 1606 (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act); and

inclusion in the official election pamphlet.

History.

(§ 2.09 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 26 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 36 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 10 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.10.100.
Judicial review of precinct boundary.

Any person aggrieved by a determination of precinct boundaries by the director may bring a civil action to have the determination reviewed in the superior court.
If the action receives final determination within 40 days before the election, the director may not make the required modification in precinct boundaries until immediately after the election.

History.

(§ 2.10 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 21 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 27 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.10.105.
Division of elections; personnel rules.

The division of elections is created. The lieutenant governor shall control and supervise the division of elections. The lieutenant governor shall appoint a director of elections. The director shall act for the lieutenant governor in the supervision of central and regional election offices, the hiring, performance evaluation, promotion, termination, and all other matters relating to the employment and training of election personnel, and the administration of all state elections as well as those municipal elections that the state is required to conduct. The director is responsible for the coordination of state responsibilities under 42 U.S.C. 1973gg (National Voter Registration Act of 1993). The director serves at the pleasure of the lieutenant governor.

It is essential that the nonpartisan nature, integrity, credibility, and impartiality of the administration of elections be maintained. To that end,

the director of elections, the election supervisors appointed under AS

15.10.110

, and the full-time members of the director’s staff

may not join, support or otherwise participate in a partisan political organization, faction, or activity, including but not limited to the making of political contributions; and

may not hold or campaign for elective office, be an officer of a political party or member or officer of a political committee, permit their name to be used, or make any contributions, in support of or in opposition to a candidate or a ballot proposition or question, participate in any way in a national, state, or local election campaign, or lobby or employ or assist a lobbyist;

the full-time employees of the division of elections, except for the director of elections and the elections supervisors appointed under AS

15.10.110

, are subject to the personnel rules adopted under the authority of AS

39.25.150

(7), (15), and (16); and

the director of elections, the election supervisors appointed under AS 15.10.110, and the full-time members of the director’s staff may, notwithstanding (1) of this subsection, express private opinion, register as to political party, and vote.

History.

(§ 13 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 28 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 111 SLA 1994; am §§ 2, 3 ch 58 SLA 1995; am § 13 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in subsection (a), “42 U.S.C. 1973gg” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. 1933gg” to correct a manifest error in § 12, ch. 111, SLA 1994.

Editor’s notes. —

The provisions of this chapter refer to 42 U.S.C. 1973 et seq., (National Voter Registration Act of 1993), which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 10101, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Sec. 15.10.107.
Staff training.

The director shall, before each primary election in even-numbered years, provide for a comprehensive training program for election officials, both the full-time members of the staff of the division of elections and those who are appointed as members of election boards under AS

15.10.120

—

15.10.140

and other temporary election employees. The director shall prepare and, not later than March 1, file with the lieutenant governor a plan that describes the comprehensive training program for election officials to be provided to those officials during that calendar year.

History.

(§ 13 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 29 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 1995; am § 9 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 113 SLA 2003)

Sec. 15.10.108.
Youth vote ambassador program.

The youth vote ambassador program is established in the division of elections.

In order to serve as a member of the youth vote ambassador program, an individual must

be a student age 16 or older

enrolled in a public or private high school program in this state; or

being educated in the student’s home by a parent or legal guardian in this state under AS

14.30.010(b)(12)

;

volunteer to serve in the youth vote ambassador program and be appointed to the youth vote ambassador program by the director of elections; and

if appointed, agree to complete a program of training as determined by the director of elections.

An election supervisor may appoint a member of the youth vote ambassador program to serve on a precinct election board appointed under AS

15.10.120

. A program member who is appointed to serve on an election board under this subsection serves under the supervision of the chairperson for that board.

A member of the program who is appointed under (c) of this section is compensated as provided in AS

15.15.380

only for service on the election board of the precinct.

A member of the program may provide unpaid volunteer services related to education and outreach on state elections as directed by, and under the supervision of, the director of elections.

In this section, “program” means the youth vote ambassador program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 161 SLA 2004)

Sec. 15.10.110.
Appointment of election supervisors.

The director shall appoint election supervisors, including one in each of the municipalities of Juneau, Anchorage, Fairbanks, and Nome, to assist in the administration of elections in the house districts designated by the director. The director may appoint as an election supervisor a person who is a qualified voter in the area over which the person has jurisdiction and who meets the applicable requirements of AS

15.10.105(b)

. An election supervisor is entitled to receive compensation in an amount that is comparable to that received for similar state employment as determined by the director.

History.

(§ 2.11 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 5 ch 26 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 1974; am § 30 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 37 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.10.120.
Appointment of election board.

An election supervisor shall appoint in each precinct within the election supervisor’s district an election board composed of at least three qualified voters registered to vote in that precinct. If the election supervisor is unable to locate three qualified individuals registered to vote in that precinct who are willing and able to serve on the election board, the election supervisor may appoint any qualified individual registered to vote in the house district in which the precinct is located. If the election supervisor is unable to locate three qualified individuals registered to vote in the precinct or in the district who are willing and able to serve on the election board, the election supervisor may appoint any qualified individual registered to vote in this state. In addition to the three qualified voters registered to vote in the precinct, district, or state, an election supervisor may also appoint not more than two members of the youth vote ambassador program established in AS

15.10.108

to serve on a precinct election board.

On or before April 15 in each regular election year, or at least 60 days before a special election, a party district committee or state party central committee of each political party may nominate two candidates for each election board. Nominations shall be presented in writing to the election supervisor for the district in which the precinct is located.

An election supervisor shall appoint one nominee of the political party or political group with the largest number of registered voters at the time of the preceding gubernatorial election and one nominee of the political party or political group with the second largest number of registered voters at the time of the preceding gubernatorial election. However, the election supervisor may appoint a qualified person registered as a member of a third political party or political group or as a nonpartisan or undeclared voter if a party district committee or state party central committee of the party or group with the largest number of registered voters or the party or group with the second largest number of registered voters at the time of the preceding gubernatorial election fails to present the names prescribed by (b) of this section by April 15 of a regular election year or at least 60 days before a special primary election.

An election supervisor shall appoint a chairperson for each election board within the election supervisor’s district.

When appointments to the election board have been accepted by the respective appointees, the election supervisor shall notify the director of the names and mailing addresses of the designated chairperson and other election board officials.

For a municipal election in which voters cast ballots at polling places in their precincts, election boards shall be appointed by the appropriate municipality.

History.

(§ 2.12 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 31 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 82 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 161 SLA 2004; am § 8 ch 9 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 2014; § 2, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to subsection (c), see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 10, 2013, in (a), substituted “vote in the house district in which the precinct is located” for “vote in the election district in which the precinct is located” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2014 amendment, effective September 17, 2014, in (f), substituted “For a municipal election in which voters cast ballots at polling places in their precincts, election boards” for “Election boards for municipal elections”.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote (c).

Editor's notes. —

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended subsection (c), provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable. If any provision of this Act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 15.10.125.
Appointment of additional election boards.

In each precinct having 200 or more voters additional election boards may be appointed.

History.

(§ 3 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 13 ch 116 SLA 1972)

Sec. 15.10.130.
Appointment of clerks. [Repealed, § 92 ch 82 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 15.10.140.
Appointment of counters.

The chairperson of the election board may appoint a team of counters to assist with the counting of the ballots in each precinct where the election supervisor considers it necessary.
The appointments may be made from among the qualified voters in the precincts in which they reside, and may be made at any time before the completion of the precinct count.
There shall be four counters on each counting team, no more than two of whom may be of the same political party.

History.

(§ 2.14 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 5 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 14 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 32 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “chairperson” was substituted for “chairman” in accordance with sec. 95(3), ch. 82, SLA 2000.

Sec. 15.10.150.
Appointment of nominees for judges and clerks. [Repealed, § 92 ch 82 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 15.10.160.
Date and notice of appointment of election board. [Repealed, § 9 ch 136 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 15.10.170.
Appointment and privileges of watchers.

The precinct party committee, where an organized precinct committee exists, or the party district committee where no organized precinct committee exists, or the state party chairperson where neither a precinct nor a party district committee exists, may appoint one or more persons as watchers in each precinct and counting center for any election. Each candidate may appoint one or more watchers for each precinct or counting center in the candidate’s respective district or the state for any election. Any organization or organized group that sponsors or opposes an initiative, referendum, or recall may have one or more persons as watchers at the polls and counting centers after first obtaining authorization from the director. A state party chairperson, a precinct party committee, a party district committee, or a candidate may not have more than one watcher on duty at a time in any precinct or counting center. A watcher must be a United States citizen. The watcher may be present at a position inside the place of voting or counting that affords a full view of all action of the election officials taken from the time the polls are opened until the ballots are finally counted and the results certified by the election board or the data processing review board. The election board or the data processing review board may require each watcher to present written proof showing appointment by the precinct party committee, the party district committee, the organization or organized group, or the candidate the watcher represents.

In addition to the watchers appointed under (a) of this section, in a primary election or special primary election or special election under AS

15.40.140

, each candidate may appoint one watcher in each precinct and counting center.

History.

(§ 2.17 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 10 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 23 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 15 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 34 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 82 SLA 2000; am §§ 3, 4 ch 73 SLA 2013; § 3, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to this section, see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added the fifth sentence in (a), “A watcher must be a United States citizen.”; added (b).

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (a), in the second sentence, deleted “not representing a political party” following “Each candidate”; in the fourth sentence, deleted “not representing a political party or organization or organized group” following “or a candidate”; in the last sentence, at the end, deleted “that is signed by the chairperson of the precinct party committee, the party district committee, the state party chairperson, the organization or organized group, or the candidate representing no party”; in (b), substituted “or special primary election or special election under AS

15.40.140

,” for “, special election under AS

15.40.140

, or special runoff election under AS 15,40.141,” following “in a primary election”.

Editor's notes. —

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable. If any provision of this Act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 15.10.180.
Appointment of state ballot counting review board.

The director shall appoint two persons from the political party of which the governor is a member and two persons from the political party that received the second largest number of votes statewide in the preceding gubernatorial election to participate in the state ballot counting review. The director may appoint additional individuals to participate in the state ballot counting review. Appointees must be United States citizens. Each political party may present to the director a list of three or more names from which the director shall select the persons to represent the party. The list of names may be submitted in writing at least 30 days before the date of the election. The list of names shall be certified by the state chairperson of the political party or by the person authorized by the party bylaws to act in the absence of the chairperson.

History.

(§ 2.18 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 35 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 34 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 12 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 73 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added the third sentence, “Appointees must be United States citizens.”